District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

24-401a

Board of Parole — Created; members; procedural rules; transfer of powers, employees, supplies and appropriations of Board of Indeterminate Sentence and Parole; duties of Parole Executive; cooperation of Department of Corrections.

Repealed.

Apr. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-103, § 5(a), 34 DCR 8279
1981 Ed., §§ 24-201a, 24-201b.